Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1638
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; duties; political subdivision; application for disbursement.

(1) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall, as the representative of and under the direction of the Governor, be the administrative agency for the selection of projects pursuant to section 81-1636, allocation of funds to the projects, and monitoring of the uses of the funds so allocated.

(2) The department shall contract with any and all grantees of funds in and recipients of loans from the fund. The contracts shall include provisions for reporting on and accounting for the use of the funds by the grantee or loan recipient to the department, and any contracts or agreements entered into before appropriations are made by the Legislature shall recite that they are subject to appropriations of the fund by the Legislature.

(3) Any political subdivision of this state may apply for, and shall be eligible to receive, a disbursement for a project pursuant to section 81-1636, including a disbursement of loan proceeds.

Laws 1987, LB 683, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 479, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 170;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 459.